Wyoming, session 2025, SF0023.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-213(c), (d)(ii)(intro) and
(g)(ii)(B) is amended to read:
31-2-213. Department to supply registration
certificates, plates and stickers; removable windshield
placards.
(c) The department shall issue a special tamper
resistant removable windshield placard to an applicant
submitting a letter from his physician, or advanced
practice registered nurse, physician assistant, physical
therapist, occupational therapist, podiatrist or
optometrist stating the applicant has a disability that is
expected to last a minimum of twelve (12) months which
limits or impairs the ability to walk, or to any person
responsible for the regular transportation of eligible
persons with a disability that is expected to last a
minimum of twelve (12) months which limits or impairs the
ability to walk who submits such a letter on behalf of an
eligible person. The placard shall display the
international symbol of access. When a vehicle is parked in
an area reserved for the handicapped, the placard shall be
suspended from the rearview mirror inside the vehicle, so
as to be in plain view of any person looking through the
front windshield of the vehicle from the sidewalk or
roadside. For motor vehicles which do not have rearview
mirrors, the placard shall be displayed on the dashboard of
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the parked vehicle, on the side nearest the curb or
roadside. Upon request, one (1) additional placard shall be
issued to applicants who have not been issued special
license plates.
(d) As used in this section:
(ii) "Eligible person" means a person with
disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk as
determined by a licensed physician, or advanced practice
registered nurse, physician assistant, physical therapist,
occupational therapist, podiatrist or optometrist,
including:
(g) The department shall issue a temporary removable
windshield placard under the same procedures and subject to
the same conditions as provided in subsections (c) through
(e) of this section except:
(ii) The temporary placard shall:
(B) Expire on and bear an expiration date
which shall be visible from outside the vehicle when the
card is properly displayed under subsection (c) of this
section and be based on the information in the physician's
letter required by subsection (c) of this section.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3